Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB427.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. The Legislative Branch Budget is as follows:
PART I
OPERATING BUDGET
Funds Appropriations: Funds are appropriated to the Legislative Research
Commission for the Legislative Branch of government out of the General Fund and
Restricted Funds accounts for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30,
2027, and for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and ending June 30, 2028, in the
following discrete sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary. Each appropriation is
made by the source of respective fund or funds accounts to be used for the purposes of
the Legislative Branch of government of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
A. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH
Budget Units
2026-27 2027-28
1. General Assembly
General Fund 23,902,900 25,910,000
Restricted Funds 75,000 175,000
TOTAL 23,977,900 26,085,000
(1) Kentucky Legislative Ethics Commission: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $567,700 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium for
the Kentucky Legislative Ethics Commission. Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $75,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $175,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028
for the Kentucky Legislative Ethics Commission.
(2) Kentucky Long-Term Policy Research Center: Notwithstanding KRS
7B.010 to 7B.090, operation of the Kentucky Long-Term Policy Research Center and its
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/12/2026 10:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1370
governing board shall continue to be suspended effective July 1, 2026, and shall remain
suspended for the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium or until funding is restored. No funds are
appropriated for the Kentucky Long-Term Policy Research Center for fiscal year 2026-
2027 and fiscal year 2027-2028.
(3) Pension Benefit Increase: Notwithstanding KRS 6.521(3), no pension
benefit increase shall be granted to recipients of a retirement allowance under KRS 6.500
to 6.577 on July 1, 2026.
(4) Legislators Compensation: Notwithstanding KRS 6.190 and 6.213, the daily
compensation provided by KRS 6.190 and the interim expense allowance provided by
KRS 6.213 for members of the General Assembly shall be as authorized by the 2024-
2026 biennium and shall continue as adjusted on January 1, 2027, by the salary increment
provided to state employees in the State/Executive Branch Budget.
2026-27 2027-28
2. Legislative Research Commission
General Fund 65,767,600 67,701,400
(1) Legislative Record: Notwithstanding KRS 7.105, distribution of the final
issue of the Legislative Record and the interim Legislative Record shall be suspended
effective July 1, 2026.
(2) Legislative Publications: Notwithstanding KRS Chapters 27A and 57, the
Acts of the General Assembly, the Journals of the Senate and House of Representatives,
and the official Kentucky statute publications may be distributed by use of electronic
versions only, at the discretion of the Director of the Legislative Research Commission.
TOTAL - OPERATING BUDGET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 89,670,500 93,611,400
Restricted Funds 75,000 175,000
TOTAL 89,745,500 93,786,400
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/12/2026 10:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1370
Unexpended Balance: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unexpended balance
remaining at the close of fiscal year 2025-2026 shall not lapse but shall continue into
fiscal year 2026-2027, and any unexpended balance in any succeeding fiscal year shall
not lapse but shall continue into the following fiscal year.
TOTAL - LEGISLATIVE BRANCH BUDGET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 89,670,500 93,611,400
Restricted Funds 75,000 175,000
TOTAL 89,745,500 93,786,400
PART II
GENERAL PROVISIONS
1. Expenditure Authority: The Director of the Legislative Research
Commission, under the supervision of the Legislative Research Commission, may expend
any of the funds appropriated for legislative operation and administration in any lawful
manner and for any legal purpose consistent with the policies and practices of the
Commission. No executive agency or statute governing the executive agencies of state
government shall have the power to restrict or limit the actions of, or the expenditure of
funds appropriated to, the Legislative Research Commission for the Legislative Branch of
government.
2. Capitol and Capitol Annex Capital Construction Expenditures: Any
expenditure authorized by the Director of the Legislative Research Commission, under
the supervision of the Legislative Research Commission, relating to implementation of
KRS 56.463(4)(b), or relating to the Capitol Building, and funded by previous or current
appropriations to the Legislative Research Commission for the Legislative Branch of
government shall not be governed by KRS 7A.010, 7A.120, 45.750 to 45.810,
48.010(16), 48.020, and 48.110.
3. Severability of Budget Provisions: Appropriation items and sums in this Act
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/12/2026 10:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1370
conform to KRS 48.311. If any section, any subsection, or any provision thereof shall be
invalid or unconstitutional, the decision of the courts shall not affect or impair any of the
remaining sections, subsections, or provisions.
4. Duplicate Appropriation: Any appropriation item and sum in this Act and in
an appropriation provision in another Act of the 2026 Regular Session of the General
Assembly which constitutes a duplicate appropriation shall be governed by KRS 48.312.
5. Priority of Individual Appropriations: KRS 48.313 shall control when a
total or subtotal figure in this Act conflicts with the sum of the appropriations of which it
consists.
6. Appropriations Revisions: Proposed revisions to Restricted Funds
appropriations in this Act shall be made and reported pursuant to KRS 48.630(10).
7. Allowance in Lieu of Stationery: Notwithstanding KRS 6.220, in lieu of
stationery, there shall be allowed to each member of the House of Representatives the
sum of $350 and to each member of the Senate the sum of $650. This allowance shall be
paid out of the State Treasury at the beginning of each legislative session.
8. Salary Adjustments: In each fiscal year, employees of the Legislative
Research Commission shall receive a salary adjustment in accordance with the salary
adjustment provided to state employees in the State/Executive Branch Budget.
9. Administrative Expenses: Pursuant to KRS 21.540, administrative expenses
shall be paid out of an administrative account which shall be funded by transfers of the
necessary moneys, in appropriate ratio, from the funds provided for in KRS 21.550 and
21.560.
PART III
BUDGET REDUCTION OR SURPLUS EXPENDITURE PLAN
The Legislative Branch shall participate in any Budget Reduction Plan or Surplus
Expenditure Plan in accordance with KRS Chapter 48, except that obligations essential to
the constitutional duties of the Legislative Branch shall be exempt from any Budget
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/12/2026 10:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1370
Reduction Plan. The level of participation in a Budget Reduction Plan shall be at the
discretion of the Director and shall not exceed the actual percentage of revenue shortfall.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/12/2026 10:19 AM Jacketed